it: Tipo di laccetto: A sgancio di sicurezza; Da dito/cappio; Da collo; Nessuno; Retrattile; Da polso; Altro
hr-HR: Vrsta uzice: Sigurnosno otpuštanje; Prst/omča; Vrat; Nema; Na uvlačenje; Zapešće; Ostalo
nb: Type nøkkelsnor: Sikkerhetslås; Finger/løkke; Hals; Ingen; Uttrekkbar; Håndledd; Annet
tr: Boyun ipi tipi: Ayrılabilir; Parmak/ilmek; Boyun; Yok; Geri çekilebilir; Bilek; Diğer
es: Tipo de cordón: Desprendible; Para dedo/lazo; Cuello; Ninguno; Retráctil; Muñeca; Otro
cs: Typ šňůrky na krk: Bezpečnostní odepínací; Na prst / smyčka; Na krk; Žádné; Zatahovací; Na zápěstí; Jiné
ru: Тип шнурка: Безопасный (разрывной); На палец / петля; Шейный; Нет; Выдвижной; На запястье; Другое
zh-TW: 掛繩類型: 安全快拆扣; 手指/套環; 頸部; 無; 伸縮式; 手腕; 其他
bg-BG: Тип връзка за носене: С предпазно откопчаване; За пръст/примка; За врат; Няма; Изтегляща се; За китка; Друго
ja: ランヤードタイプ: ブレイクアウェイ; フィンガー/ヌース; ネック; なし; 伸縮式; リスト; その他
de: Typ des Lanyards: Sicherheitsverschluss; Finger/Schlaufe; Hals; Keine; Ausziehbar; Handgelenk; Sonstige
en: Lanyard type: Breakaway; Finger/noose; Neck; None; Retractable; Wrist; Other
pt-PT: Tipo de cordão: Separável; Dedo/laço; Para o pescoço; Nenhum; Retrátil; Para o pulso; Outro
pl: Typ smyczy: Odpinana bezpiecznie; Na palec / pętla; Na szyję; Brak; Zwijana; Na nadgarstek; Inne
fi: Kaulanauhan tyyppi: Turvalukollinen; Sormilenkki; Kaulanauha; Ei mitään; Sisäänvedettävä; Rannenauha; Muu
fr: Type de cordon: À rupture de sécurité; Doigt/boucle; Tour de cou; Aucun; Rétractable; Poignet; Autre
hu: Nyakpánt típusa: Biztonsági kioldós; Ujjas/hurkos; Nyaki; Nincs; Visszahúzható; Csuklós; Egyéb
sv: Typ av snodd: Säkerhetsöppning; Finger/ögla; Hals; Ingen; Indragbar; Handled; Övrigt
vi: Loại dây đeo: Khóa an toàn; Ngón tay/vòng thòng lọng; Cổ; Không có; Có thể rút gọn; Cổ tay; Khác
nl: Lanyard type: Veiligheidssluiting; Vinger/strop; Nek; Geen; Intrekbaar; Pols; Overig
da: Nøglesnorstype: Breakaway; Finger/løkke; Hals; Ingen; Med udtræk; Håndled; Andet
th: แบบสายคล้องคอ: กระตุกหลุด; สอดนิ้ว/ห่วงคล้อง; คล้องคอ; ไม่มี; ม้วนเก็บได้; คล้องข้อมือ; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Typ šnúrky: Odtrhávacia; Na prst/slučka; Na krk; Žiadne; Zaťahovacia; Na zápästie; Iné
el: Τύπος κορδονιού: Με κούμπωμα ασφαλείας; Δακτύλου/θηλιά; Λαιμού; Κανένα; Ανασυρόμενο; Καρπού; Άλλο
sl-SI: Vrsta traku za ključe: Varnostno odpenjanje; Zanka za prst; Vratni; Brez; Potezno; Zapestni; Drugo
zh-CN: 挂绳类型: 安全扣式; 手指/套索; 挂颈; 无; 可伸缩; 腕带; 其他
ro-RO: Tip de șnur: Cu desprindere rapidă; Pentru deget/buclă; Pentru gât; Fără; Retractabil; Pentru încheietură; Altele
ko: 끈 유형: 분리형; 손가락/올가미; 목; 없음; 자동 감기; 손목; 기타
pt-BR: Cordão tipo: Fecho de segurança; Dedo/laço; Pescoço; Nenhum; Retrátil; Pulso; Outro
lt-LT: Kaklajuostės tipas: Atsiseganti; Piršto / kilpos; Kaklo; Nėra; Ištraukiama; Riešo; Kita